Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-709
Appraisers; duties.

It shall be the duty of the appraisers to carefully inspect and view the property taken or sought to be taken, and also any other property of the condemnee damaged thereby. The appraisers shall hear any party interested therein in reference to the amount of damages when they are so inspecting and viewing the property.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 9, p. 454.